apertium-ru-uk.uk.dix
<pardef n="бавов/на__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ни</l>        <r>на<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ні</l>        <r>на<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ну</l>        <r>на<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ні</l>        <r>на<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>но</l>        <r>на<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ною</l>       <r>на<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>на</l>        <r>на<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ен</l>        <r>на<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нам</l>       <r>на<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ни</l>        <r>на<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нах</l>       <r>на<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ни</l>        <r>на<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нами</l>      <r>на<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ни</l>        <r>на<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="люд/ина__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ина</l>       <r>ина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ини</l>       <r>ина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ині</l>       <r>ина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ину</l>       <r>ина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>иною</l>      <r>ина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ині</l>       <r>ина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ино</l>       <r>ина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>         <r>ина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ей</l>        <r>ина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ям</l>        <r>ина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ей</l>        <r>ина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ьми</l>       <r>ина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ях</l>        <r>ина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>       	<r>ина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="д/итина__n">
  <e>       <p><l>итина</l>     <r>итина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>итини</l>     <r>итина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>итині</l>     <r>итина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>итину</l>     <r>итина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>итиною</l>    <r>итина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>итині</l>     <r>итина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>итино</l>     <r>итина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>іти</l>       <r>итина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ітей</l>      <r>итина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ітям</l>      <r>итина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ітей</l>      <r>итина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ітьми</l>     <r>итина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ітях</l>      <r>итина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>іти</l>       <r>итина<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="кра/й__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ю</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>єві</l>       <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ю</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>й</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ю</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="check"><p><l>є</l><r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>єм</l>        <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>й</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>їв</l>        <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ям</l>        <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ях</l>        <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ями</l>       <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="афелі/й__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ю</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>єві</l>       <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ю</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>й</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ю</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ю</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>єм</l>        <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>й</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>їв</l>        <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ям</l>        <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ях</l>        <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ями</l>       <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l>         <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!--verbs paradigms - парадигми дієслів -->

<!--base paradigms-->
<pardef n="BASE__йд\и_imp">
  <e>       <p><l>імо</l>       <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ім</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>         <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>іть</l>       <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="афелій">          <i>афелі</i><par n="афелі/й__n"/></e>
<e lm="бавовна">         <i>бавов</i><par n="бавов/на__n"/></e>
<e lm="кайнозой">        <i>кайнозо</i><par n="афелі/й__n"/></e>
<e lm="коровай">         <i>корова</i><par n="афелі/й__n"/></e>
<e lm="край">            <i>кра</i><par n="кра/й__n"/></e>
<e lm="трофей">          <i>трофе</i><par n="афелі/й__n"/></e>
<e lm="чай">             <i>ча</i><par n="кра/й__n"/></e>
<e lm="дитина">          <i>д</i><par n="д/итина__n"/></e>
<e lm="людина">          <i>люд</i><par n="люд/ина__n"/></e>
